third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/tg_TG.aff
FLAG num
SFX 436 N 3
SFX 436 0 ине .
SFX 436 0 инеро .
SFX 436 0 инест .

SFX 437 N 4
SFX 437 0 иниҳо .
SFX 437 0 иниҳои .
SFX 437 0 иниҳоро .
SFX 437 0 иниҳояш .

SFX 438 N 1
SFX 438 0 иние .

SFX 439 N 6
SFX 439 0 иниён .
SFX 439 0 иниёнатон .
SFX 439 0 иниёнатонро .
SFX 439 0 иниёнашон .
SFX 439 0 иниёни .
SFX 439 0 иниёнро .

SFX 440 N 1
SFX 440 0 ино .

SFX 441 N 3
SFX 441 0 инов .
SFX 441 0 иновро .
SFX 441 0 инову .

SFX 442 N 1
SFX 442 0 инова .

SFX 443 N 1
SFX 443 0 инович .

SFX 444 N 3
SFX 444 0 инок .
SFX 444 0 иноки .
SFX 444 0 иноку .

SFX 445 N 1
SFX 445 0 инокӣ .

SFX 446 N 1
SFX 446 0 инона .

SFX 447 N 4
SFX 447 0 интар .
SFX 447 0 интари .
SFX 447 0 интарро .
SFX 447 0 интару .

SFX 448 N 1
SFX 448 0 интаре .

SFX 449 N 4
SFX 449 0 интарин .
SFX 449 0 интарини .
SFX 449 0 интаринро .
SFX 449 0 интарину .

SFX 450 N 1
SFX 450 0 интоб .

SFX 451 N 2
SFX 451 0 инфом .
SFX 451 0 инфоми .

SFX 452 N 2
SFX 452 0 инча .
SFX 452 0 инчаи .

SFX 453 N 11
SFX 453 0 истон .
SFX 453 0 истонам .
SFX 453 0 истонамон .
SFX 453 0 истонанд .
SFX 453 0 истонат .
SFX 453 0 истонаш .
SFX 453 0 истонашон .
SFX 453 0 истонед .
SFX 453 0 истони .
SFX 453 0 истонро .
SFX 453 0 истону .

SFX 454 N 4
SFX 454 0 истонҳо .
SFX 454 0 истонҳову .
SFX 454 0 истонҳои .
SFX 454 0 истонҳоро .

SFX 455 N 1
SFX 455 0 истонҳое .

SFX 456 N 10
SFX 456 0 истонӣ .
SFX 456 0 истониам .
SFX 456 0 истонианд .
SFX 456 0 истониашон .
SFX 456 0 истониву .
SFX 456 0 истонии .
SFX 456 0 истониро .
SFX 456 0 истонист .
SFX 456 0 истонию .
SFX 456 0 истониям .

SFX 457 N 3
SFX 457 0 истоне .
SFX 457 0 истонеро .
SFX 457 0 истонест .

SFX 458 N 4
SFX 458 0 истониҳо .
SFX 458 0 истониҳову .
SFX 458 0 истониҳои .
SFX 458 0 истониҳоро .

SFX 459 N 1
SFX 459 0 истониҳое .

SFX 460 N 1
SFX 460 0 истонигиро .

SFX 461 N 4
SFX 461 0 истониён .
SFX 461 0 истониёни .
SFX 461 0 истониёнро .
SFX 461 0 истониёну .

SFX 462 N 1
SFX 462 0 истониёне .

SFX 463 N 2
SFX 463 0 итар .
SFX 463 0 итаранд .

SFX 464 N 3
SFX 464 0 итарин .
SFX 464 0 итаринашон .
SFX 464 0 итарини .

SFX 465 N 1
SFX 465 0 итаринҳояш .

SFX 466 N 2
SFX 466 0 итоб .
SFX 466 0 итоби .

SFX 467 N 1
SFX 467 0 ифом .

SFX 468 N 1
SFX 468 0 ихон .

SFX 469 N 6
SFX 469 0 ича .
SFX 469 0 ичаам .
SFX 469 0 ичааш .
SFX 469 0 ичаву .
SFX 469 0 ичаи .
SFX 469 0 ичаро .

SFX 470 N 3
SFX 470 0 ичаҳо .
SFX 470 0 ичаҳои .
SFX 470 0 ичаҳоро .

SFX 471 N 1
SFX 471 0 ичаҳое .

SFX 472 N 1
SFX 472 0 ичавор .

SFX 473 N 3
SFX 473 0 ичае .
SFX 473 0 ичаеро .
SFX 473 0 ичаест .

SFX 474 N 17
SFX 474 0 иш .
SFX 474 0 ишам .
SFX 474 0 ишамон .
SFX 474 0 ишамонро .
SFX 474 0 ишамро .
SFX 474 0 ишанд .
SFX 474 0 ишат .
SFX 474 0 ишатон .
SFX 474 0 ишатонро .
SFX 474 0 ишатро .
SFX 474 0 ишаш .
SFX 474 0 ишашон .
SFX 474 0 ишашонро .
SFX 474 0 ишашро .
SFX 474 0 иши .
SFX 474 0 ишро .
SFX 474 0 ишу .

SFX 475 N 16
SFX 475 0 ишҳо .
SFX 475 0 ишҳову .
SFX 475 0 ишҳои .
SFX 475 0 ишҳоро .
SFX 475 0 ишҳост .
SFX 475 0 ишҳою .
SFX 475 0 ишҳоям .
SFX 475 0 ишҳоямон .
SFX 475 0 ишҳоямро .
SFX 475 0 ишҳоят .
SFX 475 0 ишҳоятон .
SFX 475 0 ишҳоятонро .
SFX 475 0 ишҳояш .
SFX 475 0 ишҳояшон .
SFX 475 0 ишҳояшонро .
SFX 475 0 ишҳояшро .

SFX 476 N 3
SFX 476 0 ишҳое .
SFX 476 0 ишҳоеро .
SFX 476 0 ишҳоест .

SFX 477 N 8
SFX 477 0 ишӣ .
SFX 477 0 ишиам .
SFX 477 0 ишиаш .
SFX 477 0 ишиашро .
SFX 477 0 ишиву .
SFX 477 0 ишии .
SFX 477 0 иширо .
SFX 477 0 ишию .

SFX 478 N 2
SFX 478 0 ишак .
SFX 478 0 ишакро .

SFX 479 N 5
SFX 479 0 ишвар .
SFX 479 0 ишваранд .
SFX 479 0 ишвараш .
SFX 479 0 ишвари .
SFX 479 0 ишвару .

SFX 480 N 3
SFX 480 0 ишварӣ .
SFX 480 0 ишварии .
SFX 480 0 ишвариро .

SFX 481 N 1
SFX 481 0 ишваре .

SFX 482 N 2
SFX 482 0 ишварон .
SFX 482 0 ишварони .

SFX 483 N 8
SFX 483 0 ишворӣ .
SFX 483 0 ишворианд .
SFX 483 0 ишвориашон .
SFX 483 0 ишвориву .
SFX 483 0 ишвории .
SFX 483 0 ишвориро .
SFX 483 0 ишворист .
SFX 483 0 ишворию .

SFX 484 N 2
SFX 484 0 ишвориҳо .
SFX 484 0 ишвориҳои .

SFX 485 N 1
SFX 485 0 ишвориҳоест .

SFX 486 N 3
SFX 486 0 ишгаҳ .
SFX 486 0 ишгаҳаш .
SFX 486 0 ишгаҳи .

SFX 487 N 1
SFX 487 0 ишгаҳҳои .

SFX 488 N 1
SFX 488 0 ишгаҳест .

SFX 489 N 5
SFX 489 0 ишгар .
SFX 489 0 ишгаранд .
SFX 489 0 ишгари .
SFX 489 0 ишгарро .
SFX 489 0 ишгару .

SFX 490 N 3
SFX 490 0 ишгарӣ .
SFX 490 0 ишгарии .
SFX 490 0 ишгариро .

SFX 491 N 2
SFX 491 0 ишгаре .
SFX 491 0 ишгарест .

SFX 492 N 1
SFX 492 0 ишгариҳои .

SFX 493 N 5
SFX 493 0 ишгарон .
SFX 493 0 ишгаронаш .
SFX 493 0 ишгарони .
SFX 493 0 ишгаронро .
SFX 493 0 ишгарону .

SFX 494 N 1
SFX 494 0 ишгарона .

SFX 495 N 1
SFX 495 0 ишгароне .

SFX 496 N 7
SFX 496 0 ишгоҳ .
SFX 496 0 ишгоҳамон .
SFX 496 0 ишгоҳанд .
SFX 496 0 ишгоҳаш .
SFX 496 0 ишгоҳи .
SFX 496 0 ишгоҳро .
SFX 496 0 ишгоҳу .

SFX 497 N 6
SFX 497 0 ишгоҳҳо .
SFX 497 0 ишгоҳҳову .
SFX 497 0 ишгоҳҳои .
SFX 497 0 ишгоҳҳоро .
SFX 497 0 ишгоҳҳою .
SFX 497 0 ишгоҳҳояшон .

SFX 498 N 2
SFX 498 0 ишгоҳҳое .
SFX 498 0 ишгоҳҳоест .

SFX 499 N 4
SFX 499 0 ишгоҳӣ .
SFX 499 0 ишгоҳии .
SFX 499 0 ишгоҳиро .
SFX 499 0 ишгоҳист .

SFX 500 N 2
SFX 500 0 ишгоҳе .
SFX 500 0 ишгоҳест .

SFX 501 N 1
SFX 501 0 ишгор .

SFX 502 N 3
SFX 502 0 ише .
SFX 502 0 ишеро .
SFX 502 0 ишест .

SFX 503 N 1
SFX 503 0 ишие .

SFX 504 N 2
SFX 504 0 ишиён .
SFX 504 0 ишиёни .

SFX 505 N 4
SFX 505 0 ишкада .
SFX 505 0 ишкадаву .
SFX 505 0 ишкадаи .
SFX 505 0 ишкадаро .

SFX 506 N 3
SFX 506 0 ишкадаҳо .
SFX 506 0 ишкадаҳои .
SFX 506 0 ишкадаҳоро .

SFX 507 N 1
SFX 507 0 ишкадае .

SFX 508 N 6
SFX 508 0 ишманд .
SFX 508 0 ишмандам .
SFX 508 0 ишмандем .
SFX 508 0 ишманди .
SFX 508 0 ишмандро .
SFX 508 0 ишманду .

SFX 509 N 4
SFX 509 0 ишмандӣ .
SFX 509 0 ишмандиву .
SFX 509 0 ишмандии .
SFX 509 0 ишмандию .

SFX 510 N 2
SFX 510 0 ишманде .
SFX 510 0 ишмандеро .

SFX 511 N 5
SFX 511 0 ишмандон .
SFX 511 0 ишмандонашон .
SFX 511 0 ишмандони .
SFX 511 0 ишмандонро .
SFX 511 0 ишмандону .

SFX 512 N 1
SFX 512 0 ишмандона .

SFX 513 N 1
SFX 513 0 ишмандонатар .

SFX 514 N 2
SFX 514 0 ишмандоне .
SFX 514 0 ишмандонест .

SFX 515 N 1
SFX 515 0 ишмандтар .

SFX 516 N 2
SFX 516 0 ишнок .
SFX 516 0 ишноки .

SFX 517 N 1
SFX 517 0 ишноке .

SFX 518 N 2
SFX 518 0 ишон .
SFX 518 0 ишону .

SFX 519 N 5
SFX 519 0 ишот .
SFX 519 0 ишоташон .
SFX 519 0 ишоти .
SFX 519 0 ишотро .
SFX 519 0 ишоту .

SFX 520 N 1
SFX 520 0 иштар .

SFX 521 N 1
SFX 521 0 иштарин .

SFX 522 N 1
SFX 522 0 ишчӣ .

SFX 523 N 1
SFX 523 0 ишчиён .

SFX 524 N 7
SFX 524 0 ия .
SFX 524 0 ияатон .
SFX 524 0 ияву .
SFX 524 0 ияи .
SFX 524 0 ияро .
SFX 524 0 ияст .
SFX 524 0 ияю .

SFX 525 N 4
SFX 525 0 ияҳо .
SFX 525 0 ияҳои .
SFX 525 0 ияҳоро .
SFX 525 0 ияҳост .

SFX 526 N 1
SFX 526 0 ияҳое .

SFX 527 N 6
SFX 527 0 иявӣ .
SFX 527 0 иявиаш .
SFX 527 0 иявиашон .
SFX 527 0 иявии .
SFX 527 0 иявиро .
SFX 527 0 иявию .

SFX 528 N 2
SFX 528 0 ияе .
SFX 528 0 ияест .

SFX 529 N 1
SFX 529 0 иятҳои .

SFX 530 N 1
SFX 530 0 ияхон .

SFX 531 N 7
SFX 531 0 када .
SFX 531 0 кадаам .
SFX 531 0 кадааш .
SFX 531 0 кадаву .
SFX 531 0 кадаи .
SFX 531 0 кадаро .
SFX 531 0 кадаю .

SFX 532 N 3
SFX 532 0 кадаҳо .
SFX 532 0 кадаҳои .
SFX 532 0 кадаҳоро .

SFX 533 N 1
SFX 533 0 кадаҳое .

SFX 534 N 2
SFX 534 0 кадае .
SFX 534 0 кадаест .

SFX 535 N 4
SFX 535 0 лох .
SFX 535 0 лохи .
SFX 535 0 лохро .
SFX 535 0 лоху .

SFX 536 N 2
SFX 536 0 лохе .
SFX 536 0 лохест .

SFX 537 N 1
SFX 537 0 лохон .

SFX 538 N 1
SFX 538 0 мӣ .

SFX 539 N 16
SFX 539 0 манд .
SFX 539 0 мандам .
SFX 539 0 мандамон .
SFX 539 0 мандамро .
SFX 539 0 манданд .
SFX 539 0 манданду .
SFX 539 0 мандат .
SFX 539 0 мандаш .
SFX 539 0 мандашон .
SFX 539 0 мандашонро .
SFX 539 0 мандашро .
SFX 539 0 мандед .
SFX 539 0 мандем .
SFX 539 0 манди .
SFX 539 0 мандро .
SFX 539 0 манду .

SFX 540 N 13
SFX 540 0 мандӣ .
SFX 540 0 мандиамро .
SFX 540 0 мандианд .
SFX 540 0 мандиаш .
SFX 540 0 мандиашон .
SFX 540 0 мандиашонро .
SFX 540 0 мандиашро .
SFX 540 0 мандиву .
SFX 540 0 мандии .
SFX 540 0 мандиро .
SFX 540 0 мандист .
SFX 540 0 мандию .
SFX 540 0 мандиям .
