third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/tg_TG.dic
асос/25,852,94,7,8,29,859,862,853,402,855,463,464,465,863,569,571,699,14,15
бебур/474
боарз/474,502,520,521
гарм/852,35,64,70,2,858,5,6,7,8,254,29,859,344,862,853,402,409,855,469,470,863,580,607,14,742,752,15
гулоб/852,7,229,302,29,859,410,855,466,862,586,14,15
деҳ/25,68,64,3,4,7,8,195,29,859,453,461,531,532,533,534,580,699,700,702,707,708,710,14,15
дев/25,64,4,7,254,29,859,531,535,536,552,31,627,629,630,633,640,14,722,726,732,15,787
дон/25,852,1,64,2,3,4,104,109,112,842,7,29,10,11,859,862,853,855,474,475,476,479,480,481,482,489,496,497,498,499,500,502,505,506,507,508,509,510,511,512,513,514,515,14,15,787
зар/25,852,64,2,857,4,5,7,147,229,230,231,232,233,237,239,291,302,29,11,859,369,855,421,426,436,450,580,601,14,726,759,15,775
кӯҳ/25,852,35,2,5,6,7,140,195,29,11,859,853,855,453,454,456,458,459,460,461,462,862,552,555,556,557,559,31,14,722,726,727,730,732,15,787
кӯдак/25,852,75,64,2,3,857,4,5,6,7,8,140,142,195,29,11,859,344,862,853,855,453,454,455,457,863,856,580,31,627,633,14,15,787
камбуд/25,852,36,43,29,859,344,345,853,402,855,444,862,15
киром/852,5,859,463,14
куруш/859,531
лапп/369,382,474,475,502,516,31
мадҳ/25,7,229,237,29,859,524,525,530,15,778,777
май/2,5,229,291,302,29,859,453,531,532,540,14,15
майдаҳунар/539
масъул/4,29,11,859,862,856,529,578,31,627,14,742,15
меҳмон/25,852,64,2,3,4,5,6,7,29,859,344,853,402,855,862,856,531,532,580,31,14,15
мушк/852,64,2,7,147,29,11,859,421,451,453,552,569,31,14,15,775
на/852,29,11,859,853,453,454,16,18,20,23
навоз/852,1,2,4,104,106,105,109,112,115,7,10,11,382,366,474,475,490,492,502,477,31,15
наргис/25,852,5,7,302,29,859,421,453,552,31,14,15,777
нашр/25,852,7,859,853,855,524,525,526,528,14,15
нигор/25,1,2,4,104,109,112,7,229,29,859,369,382,855,421,440,453,474,475,519,580,31,15
низом/25,852,7,8,29,859,853,355,402,409,855,420,862,524,526,580,584,699,14,15,777
обгард/474,31,681
озмо/10,382,474,475,477,489,491,496,497,502,519,17,18,20,831,836
озор/25,852,1,2,104,6,7,8,29,859,402,474,502,539,14,15
омурз/104,113,274,366,369,382,474,501
оро/852,9,229,10,11,859,382,474,475,477,489,496,502,516,519,14,16,17,18,20,831
оташ/25,64,65,75,2,857,4,5,7,8,140,147,175,195,224,229,237,254,291,302,303,305,29,11,859,855,421,425,853,531,532,534,552,569,14,759,15
пажӯҳ/1,4,104,109,112,114,115,369,382,474,475,476,477,489,491,490,493,495,496,497,500,502,505,519
параст/852,1,2,4,104,109,112,366,369,382,855,474,486,489,496,505,31,684,685,687,689,691,15
пас/68,2,4,5,7,8,29,859,421,426,439,571,569,588,593,31,14,15
поло/9,10,369,382,474,490,496,14,17,822,831
пурс/852,1,2,4,104,105,112,115,10,844,11,366,368,369,382,383,384,474,475,476,477,502,519,863,31,15
рӯидар/469
раҳмонқул/468,584,586,14
ранг/25,2,4,5,7,8,195,229,302,29,11,859,402,855,421,436,437,425,440,447,448,449,453,569,580,14,15
рег/25,852,64,29,337,338,342,859,855,453,454,456,552,569,14,726,15
сӯз/852,1,2,4,104,108,109,115,121,5,7,29,10,859,369,385,474,475,483,484,485,496,502,516,517,569,610,31,634,636,639,649,651,655,663,669,661,679,15,664
сербор/474,521
сигол/1,2,4,104,11,369,382,366,474,490,502
сиёҳмушк/421,436
сито/382,474,475,476,489,490,496,502,17,18,20,835,831
супор/852,1,2,4,104,10,11,366,368,369,382,384,474,475,476,489,490,502,477,519,15
тагсар/852,471
тап/1,104,859,366,369,382,383,853,474,475,487,488,496,31,655,15
тоҷик/25,852,2,3,4,5,7,8,195,29,10,11,859,853,862,402,855,453,456,457,458,461,863,856,31,627,14,15
тунд/852,64,2,29,859,862,853,382,855,474,538,742,15
турш/852,64,29,859,344,369,382,366,855,445,853,552,31,663,669,14,15
умум/852,94,4,859,853,862,402,855,463,464,856,14
умумиҷумҳур/852,527
умумидон/499
фармо/852,10,11,855,474,475,477,489,493,519,17,18,20,831
хоҳ/852,1,2,839,91,4,104,112,10,11,853,474,475,476,489,491,502,508,510,511,512,519,862,863,31,15
хор/25,852,1,64,2,5,7,8,147,163,195,29,337,341,859,344,862,853,366,369,382,855,453,474,478,516,518,863,552,569,31,636,651,655,661,14,722,742,752,15,787
чирк/29,859,421,425,436,437,447,449,569,14,759,15
шабнам/2,29,859,440,580,14,15
шарқ/25,852,7,29,859,853,862,356,409,411,855,463,464,863,14,742,15
